test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k26_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    táttur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: táttur
    táttur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: tátt
    táttur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: tátti
    táttur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: táttar
    táttur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: tættir
    táttur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: tættir
    táttur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: táttum
    táttur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: tátta
    táttur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: tátturin
    táttur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: táttin
    táttur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: táttinum
    táttur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: táttarins
    táttur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: tættirnir
    táttur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: tættirnar
    táttur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: táttunum
    táttur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: táttanna
